Connecticut, session 2026, HB05390.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Subdivision (5) of subsection (b) of section 4-66k of the 2026
2 supplement to the general statutes is repealed and the following is
3 substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
4 (5) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, and each fiscal year
5 thereafter, funds from the regional planning incentive account shall be
6 distributed to each regional council of governments formed pursuant to
7 section 4-124j as follows: (A) An amount totaling seven million dollars
8 shall be distributed pursuant to a formula determined and updated
9 every five years by the Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management
10 in consultation with the regional councils of governments that includes
11 (i) a base payment amount payable to each such regional council, and
12 (ii) a per capita payment amount to each such regional council based
13 upon population data for each such regional council from the most
HB5390 / File No. 250 1

HB5390 File No. 250
14 recent federal decennial census, (B) each such regional council shall
15 receive two hundred thousand dollars, for the purpose of funding
16 positions within each such regional council and costs associated with
17 providing technical support and legal services for the planning and
18 development of additional housing in each such regional council's
19 region, and (C) each such regional council shall receive two hundred
20 thousand dollars, for the purpose of funding a regional stormwater
21 management and flood mitigation coordinator position, [or] a regional
22 municipal solid waste and recycling coordinator position, [and
23 associated costs] or both such positions, and any associated costs.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 4-66k(b)(5)
PD Joint Favorable
HB5390 / File No. 250 2

HB5390 File No. 250
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill expands the use of funds from the Regional Planning
Incentive Account (RPIA) to allow councils of governments to use funds
for a stormwater management and flood mitigation position, a
municipal solid waste and recycling position, or both. This does not
result in a fiscal impact to the state or municipalities as it does not impact
the funds expended from the RPIA or the amount of funds the councils
of governments receives.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
HB5390 / File No. 250 3

HB5390 File No. 250
OLR Bill Analysis
HB 5390
AN ACT CONCERNING THE REGIONAL PLANNING INCENTIVE
ACCOUNT.